Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 2. Rights and Responsibilities of Patients in Nursing Homes.

§ 32.1-138.
Enumeration; posting of policies; staff training; responsibilities devolving on guardians, etc.; exceptions; certification of compliance.

The governing body of a nursing home facility required to be licensed under the provisions of Article 1 (§

32.1-123

et seq.) of this chapter, through the administrator of such facility, shall cause to be promulgated policies and procedures to ensure that, at the minimum, each patient admitted to such facility:

Is fully informed, as evidenced by the patient’s written acknowledgment, prior to or at the time of admission and during his stay, of his rights and of all rules and regulations governing patient conduct and responsibilities;

Is fully informed, as evidenced by the patient’s written acknowledgment, prior to or at the time of admission and during his stay, of services available in the facility, the terms of such services, and related charges, including any charges for services not covered under Titles XVIII or XIX of the United States Social Security Act or not covered by the facility’s basic per diem rate;

Is fully informed in summary form of the findings concerning the facility in federal Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services surveys and investigations, if any;

Is fully informed by a physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner of his medical condition unless medically contraindicated as documented by a physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner in his medical record and is afforded the opportunity to participate in the planning of his medical treatment and to refuse to participate in experimental research;

Is transferred or discharged only for medical reasons, or for his welfare or that of other patients, or for nonpayment for his stay except as prohibited by Titles XVIII or XIX of the United States Social Security Act, and is given reasonable advance notice as provided in §

32.1-138.1

to ensure orderly transfer or discharge, and such actions are documented in his medical record;

Is encouraged and assisted, throughout the period of his stay, to exercise his rights as a patient and as a citizen and to this end may voice grievances and recommend changes in policies and services to facility staff and to outside representatives of his choice, free from restraint, interference, coercion, discrimination, or reprisal;

May manage his personal financial affairs, or may have access to records of financial transactions made on his behalf at least once a month and is given at least a quarterly accounting of financial transactions made on his behalf should the facility accept his written delegation of this responsibility to the facility for any period of time in conformance with state law;

Is free from mental and physical abuse and free from chemical and, except in emergencies, physical restraints except as authorized in writing by a physician for a specified and limited period of time or when necessary to protect the patient from injury to himself or to others;

Is assured confidential treatment of his personal and medical records and may approve or refuse their release to any individual outside the facility, except in case of his transfer to another health care institution or as required by law or third-party payment contract;

Is treated with consideration, respect, and full recognition of his dignity and individuality, including privacy in treatment and in care for his personal needs;

Is not required to perform services for the facility that are not included for therapeutic purposes in his plan of care;

May associate and communicate privately with persons of his choice and send and receive his personal mail unopened, unless medically contraindicated as documented by his physician in his medical record;

May meet with and participate in activities of social, religious and community groups at his discretion, unless medically contraindicated as documented by his physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner in his medical record;

May retain and use his personal clothing and possessions as space permits unless to do so would infringe upon rights of other patients and unless medically contraindicated as documented by his physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner in his medical record;

If married, is assured privacy for visits by his or her spouse and if both are inpatients in the facility, is permitted to share a room with such spouse unless medically contraindicated as documented by the attending physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner in the medical record; and

Is fully informed, as evidenced by the written acknowledgment of the resident or his legal representative, prior to or at the time of admission and during his stay, that he should exercise whatever due diligence he deems necessary with respect to information on any sexual offenders registered pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1, including how to obtain such information. Upon request, the nursing home facility shall assist the resident, prospective resident, or the legal representative of the resident or prospective resident in accessing this information and provide the resident, prospective resident, or the legal representative of the resident or prospective resident with printed copies of the requested information.

All established policies and procedures regarding the rights and responsibilities of patients shall be printed in at least 12-point type and posted conspicuously in a public place in all nursing home facilities required to be licensed under the provisions of Article 1 (§

32.1-123

et seq.) of this chapter. These policies and procedures shall include the name and telephone number of the complaint coordinator in the Division of Licensure and Certification of the Virginia Department of Health, the Adult Protective Services’ toll-free telephone number, as well as the toll-free telephone number for the Virginia Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program and any substate ombudsman program serving the area. Copies of such policies and procedures shall be given to patients upon admittance to the facility and made available to patients currently in residence, to any guardians, responsible party as defined in regulation, next of kin, or sponsoring agency or agencies, and to the public.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to restrict any right that any patient in residence has under law.

Each facility shall provide appropriate staff training to implement each patient’s rights included in subsection A hereof.

All rights and responsibilities specified in subsection A hereof and §

32.1-138.1

as they pertain to (i) a patient adjudicated incapacitated in accordance with state law, (ii) a patient who is found, by his physician, to be medically incapable of understanding these rights, or (iii) a patient who is unable to communicate with others shall devolve to such patient’s guardian, responsible party as defined in regulation, next of kin, sponsoring agency or agencies, or representative payee, except when the facility itself is representative payee, selected pursuant to section 205(j) of Title II of the United States Social Security Act. The persons to whom such rights and responsibilities have devolved shall be deemed to have legal authority to act on the patient’s behalf with respect to the matters specified in this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prescribe, regulate, or control the remedial care and treatment or nursing service provided to any patient in a nursing institution to which the provisions of §

32.1-128

are applicable.

It shall be the responsibility of the Commissioner to insure that the provisions of this section and the provisions of §

32.1-138.1

are observed and implemented by nursing home facilities. Each nursing home facility to which this section and §

32.1-138.1

are applicable shall certify to the Commissioner that it is in compliance with the provisions of this section and the provisions of § 32.1-138.1 as a condition to the issuance or renewal of the license required by Article 1 (§

32.1-123

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-296.1; 1976, c. 349; 1979, c. 711; 1987, c. 221; 1997, c. 801; 1999, c. 783; 2000, c. 177; 2004, c. 855; 2006, c. 396; 2007, cc. 120, 163; 2010, c. 57.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall take effect 60 days following the effective date of the regulations promulgated by the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing required by the third enactment clause of this act.” Emergency regulations took effect July 15, 2004.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing shall amend regulations governing the licensure of nurse practitioners to be effective within 280 days of enactment of this act. Such amendments shall require inclusion of the nurse practitioner’s authority for signatures, certifications, stamps, verifications, affidavits and endorsements in the written protocol between the supervising physician and the nurse practitioner.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 855, in subdivisions A 4, A 13, A 14, and A 15, inserted “or nurse practitioner” following “physician”; substituted “12-point type” for “twelve point type” in subsection B; and substituted “that” for “which” in subsection C. For effective date, see Editor’s notes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 396 twice inserted “physician assistant” in subdivision A 4 and once in subdivisions A 13, A 14 and A 15.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 120 and 163 are identical, and added subdivision A 16 and made related changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 57 inserted “as evidenced by the patient’s written acknowledgment” and substituted “facility, the terms of such services, and related charges” for “facility and of related charges” in subdivision A 2, inserted “responsible party as defined in regulation” in subsections B and E, added the last sentence of subsection E, and made related punctuation changes.

Law Review.

For note on the rights of patients in nursing homes, see 5 G.M.U. L. Rev. 315 (1982).

For 2006 survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 311 (2007).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

No agency authority. —

Resident could not be compelled into arbitration based on a contract signed by her sister when the resident was admitted to a facility while in a coma because §

32.1-138

did not give the sister implicit authority to bind the resident in contract nor was the sister an agent of the resident. Gibson v. Medical Facilities of Am., Inc., 80 Va. Cir. 56, 2010 Va. Cir. LEXIS 17 (Norfolk Jan. 22, 2010).

When a comatose nursing home patient sued the general partner of the limited liability partnership that owned the nursing home, as well as current and former nursing home employees, the general partner’s motion to compel arbitration failed because: (1) when the patient’s sister signed a contract with the nursing home, which was in effect when the former employee assaulted the patient, giving rise to the patient’s suit, the sister had no authority to bind the patient to the contract, which contained an arbitration clause; and (2) §

32.1-138

did not allow the sister to implicitly bind the patient to the contract. Gibson v. Medical Facilities of Am., Inc., 79 Va. Cir. 329, 2009 Va. Cir. LEXIS 269 (Norfolk Sept. 25, 2009).

No private right of action. —

Section

32.1-138

did not provide a nursing home patient with a private right of action. The nursing home was subject to §

32.1-138

, however, regardless of the patient referring to it as an assisted living facility, because the definitions of assisted living facility in §

63.2-100

and nursing home in §

32.1-123

were not mutually exclusive. Gregory v. Sunrise Senior Living, Inc., 82 Va. Cir. 26, 2010 Va. Cir. LEXIS 259 (Virginia Beach July 28, 2010).

§ 32.1-138.1.
Implementation of transfer and discharge policies.

To implement and conform with the provisions of subdivision A 4 of §

32.1-138

, a facility may discharge the patient, or transfer the patient, including transfer within the facility, only:

If appropriate to meet that patient’s documented medical needs;

If appropriate to safeguard that patient or one or more other patients from physical or emotional injury;

On account of nonpayment for his stay except as prohibited by Titles XVIII or XIX of the United States Social Security Act and the Virginia State Plan for Medical Assistance Services; or

With the informed voluntary consent of the patient, or if incapable of providing consent, with the informed voluntary consent of the patient’s authorized decision maker pursuant to § 54.1-2986 acting in the best interest of the patient, following reasonable advance written notice.

Except in an emergency involving the patient’s health or well being, no patient shall be transferred or discharged without prior consultation with the patient, the patient’s family or responsible party and the patient’s attending physician. If the patient’s attending physician is unavailable, the facility’s medical director in conjunction with the nursing director, social worker or another health professional, shall be consulted. In the case of an involuntary transfer or discharge, the attending physician of the patient or the medical director of the facility shall make a written notation in the patient’s record approving the transfer or discharge after consideration of the effects of the transfer or discharge, appropriate actions to minimize the effects of the transfer or discharge, and the care and kind of service the patient needs upon transfer or discharge.

Except in an emergency involving the patient’s health or well being, reasonable advance written notice shall be given in the following manner. In the case of a voluntary transfer or discharge, notice shall be reasonable under the circumstances. In the case of an involuntary transfer or discharge, reasonable advance written notice shall be given to the patient at least five days prior to the discharge or transfer.

Nothing in this section or in subdivision A 4 of §

32.1-138

shall be construed to authorize or require conditions upon a transfer within a facility that are more restrictive than Titles XVIII or XIX of the United States Social Security Act or by regulations promulgated pursuant to either title.

History.

1987, c. 221; 1993, c. 692.

§ 32.1-138.2.
Certain contract provisions prohibited.

No contract or agreement for nursing home care shall contain any provisions which restrict or limit the ability of a resident to apply for and receive Medicaid or which require a specified period of residency prior to applying for Medicaid. The resident may be required to notify the facility when an application for Medicaid has been made. No contract or agreement may require a deposit or other prepayment from Medicaid recipients. No contract or agreement shall contain provisions authorizing the facility to refuse to accept retroactive Medicaid benefits.

History.

1987, c. 221.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 515, cl. 5 provides: “That the Commissioner shall accept and may approve applications for a three year open admission period for a continuing care retirement community enrolled in the state program of medical assistance as provided in 42 C.F.R. § 483.12(d) and §

32.1-138.2

.”

§ 32.1-138.3.
Third party guarantor prohibition.

Any facility certified under Title XVIII or XIX of the United States Social Security Act shall not require a third party guarantee of payment to the facility as a condition of admission or of expedited admission to, or continued stay in, the facility.
This section shall not be construed to prevent a facility from requiring an individual who has legal access to a resident’s income or resources which are available to pay for care in the facility to sign a contract without incurring personal financial liability except for breach of the duty to provide payment from the resident’s income or resources for such care.

For purposes of this section, the resident’s income or resources shall include any amount deemed to be income or resources of the resident for purposes of Medicaid eligibility and any resources transferred by the resident to a third party if the transfer disqualifies the resident from Medicaid coverage for nursing facility services.

History.

1989, c. 193.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Federal preemption. —

To the extent that §

32.1-138.3

allows an individual, who has legal access to a resident’s income and who signs an admissions contract, to be held personally liable, the Virginia Code is preempted by 42 U.S.C.S. § 1396r(c)(5)(B)(ii). Inova Health Sys. Servs. v. Bainbridge, 81 Va. Cir. 39, 2010 Va. Cir. LEXIS 81 (Fairfax July 19, 2010), aff'd, No. 101886, 2011 Va. LEXIS 255 (Va. Oct. 21, 2011).

§ 32.1-138.4.
Retaliation or discrimination against complainants.

No nursing facility may retaliate or discriminate in any manner against any person who (i) in good faith complains or provides information to, or otherwise cooperates with, the Department or any other agency of government or any person or entity operating under contract with an agency of government, having responsibility for protecting the rights of patients of nursing facilities or (ii) attempts to assert any right protected by state or federal law.

History.

1994, c. 941.

Law Review.

For a note, “Are You Breaking Some Sort of Law?:
Protecting an Employee’s Informal Complaints Under the Fair Labor Standards Act’s Anti-Retaliation Provision,” see 42 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 319 (2000).

§ 32.1-138.5.
Confidentiality of complainant’s identity.

Whenever the Department conducts inspections and investigations in response to complaints received from the public, the identity of the complainant and the identity of any patient who is the subject of the complaint, or identified therein, shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open to inspection by members of the public. Identities of the complainant and patient who is the subject of the complaint shall be revealed only if a court order so requires. Nothing contained herein shall prevent the Department, in its discretion, from disclosing to the nursing facility the nature of the complaint or the identity of the patient who is the subject of the complaint. Nothing contained herein shall prevent the Department or its employees from making reports under §

63.2-1603

et seq. If the Department intends to rely, in whole or in part, on any statements made by the complainant, at any administrative hearing brought against the nursing facility, the Department shall disclose the identity of the complainant to the nursing facility a reasonable time in advance of such hearing.

History.

1994, c. 941.